Maryland, session 2026, SB0986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
12–707.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN OWNER OR
OPERATOR OF A STATIONARY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM SHALL PAY FOR
SPECIALIZED FIRE RESPONSE TRAINING, INCLUDING SPECIALIZED EQUIPMENT FOR
BATTERY ENERGY FIRE SUPPRESSION, FOR EACH LOCAL FIRE DEPARTMENT THAT
HAS FIRE SUPPRESSION RESPONSIBILITIES IN THE AREA IN WHICH THE STATIONARY
ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM IS LOCATED.
(2) THE FIRE RESPONSE TRAINING PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL COMPLY WITH THE NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0986*

SENATE BILL 986
ASSOCIATION (NFPA) 855 STANDARD FOR THE INSTALLATION OF STATIONARY
ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS.
(B) THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL:
(1) SHALL ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.